Utah statutes.
78A-6-1209.   Establishing a Youth Court -- Sponsoring entity
responsibilities.
(1)  Youth Courts may be established by a sponsoring entity or by a private
nonprofit entity which contracts with a sponsoring entity.
(2)  The sponsoring entity shall:
(a)  oversee the formation of the Youth Court;
(b)  provide assistance with the application for certification from the Youth
Court Board; and
(c)  provide assistance for the training of Youth Court members.
